Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB191.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "tax credit" in section 1701-A.1 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 1701-A.1. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Tax credit." A tax credit authorized under any of the 123456789101112131415161718192021222324 following:* * *(8.2) Article XVII-M.* * *Section 2. Section 1709-B(a) of the act is amended to read:Section 1709-B. Limitation on Credits.--(a) The total amount of credits approved by the department shall not exceed [sixty million dollars ($60,000,000)] one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) in any fiscal year. Of that amount, [twelve million dollars ($12,000,000)] twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) shall be allocated exclusively for small businesses. However, if the total amounts allocated to either the group of applicants exclusive of small businesses or the group of small business applicants is not approved in any fiscal year, the unused portion will become available for use by the other group of qualifying taxpayers.* * *Section 3. The act is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XVII-MANGEL INVESTMENT TAX CREDITSection 1701-M. Scope of article.This article relates to the Angel Investment Tax Credit.Section 1702-M. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Accredited investor." Any of the following:(1) An individual whose net worth or joint net worth with the individual's spouse exceeds $1,000,000.(2) An individual who had individual income in excess of 20250SB0191PN0141 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 $200,000 in each of the two most recent years or joint income with that individual's spouse in excess of $300,000 in each of those years and has a reasonable expectation of reaching the same income level in the current year.(3) An entity in which all of the equity owners meet paragraph (1) or (2)."Business plan." An outline of business structure and a formal statement of business goals, including an explanation of how the goals are anticipated to be achieved."Department." The Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth."Pass-through entity." A partnership as defined in section 301(n.0) or a Pennsylvania S corporation as defined in section 301(n.1)."Program." The Angel Investment Tax Credit Program established in this article."Qualified business venture." A business that meets all of the following criteria:(1) Is headquartered or that will establish its headquarters in this Commonwealth prior to the time that the taxpayer is eligible to apply for the tax credit.(2) Maintains its headquarters in this Commonwealth for at least five years after the taxpayer applied for the tax credit.(3) Employs at least 51% of its employees in this Commonwealth at the time that the taxpayer applies for the tax credit.(4) Has fewer than 100 employees at the time that the taxpayer applies for the tax credit.(5) Has been in operation in this Commonwealth for not 20250SB0191PN0141 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 more than five consecutive years at the time that the taxpayer applies for the tax credit.(6) Has not received more than $2,000,000, in the aggregate, in private equity investments of which not more than $1,000,000 was invested by a single investor."Qualified investment." A payment of money or its equivalent for a private equity interest in a qualified business venture."Qualified tax liability." The liability for taxes imposed under Article III, IV or VI. The term shall include the liability for taxes imposed under Article III on an owner of a pass-through entity."Secretary." The Secretary of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth."Tax credit." The Angel Investment Tax Credit authorized under this article."Taxpayer." A person subject to tax under Article III, IV or VI. The term includes the shareholder, owner or member of a pass-through entity that receives a tax credit.Section 1703-M. Angel Investment Tax Credit Program.The Angel Investment Tax Credit Program is established in the department. The program shall:(1) Create a business environment that attracts and encourages early-stage financing for businesses with the potential for high growth.(2) Increase capital investment.(3) Encourage job creation.Section 1704-M. Qualified business plans.In order for a business plan to be qualified, the business plan must:(1) Indicate the potential for increasing jobs in this 20250SB0191PN0141 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commonwealth.(2) Indicate the potential for increasing capital investment in this Commonwealth.(3) Specify that the plan is based upon the development or commercialization of intellectual property for which either of the following apply:(i) patent protection under 35 U.S.C. (relating to patents) has been secured or is pending; or(ii) a copyright under 17 U.S.C. (relating to copyrights) has been secured or is pending.Section 1705-M. Credit for qualified investment.(a) Application.--A taxpayer that made a qualified investment in a taxable year may apply for a tax credit. The application shall be on a form as required by the department and shall include all of the following:(1) The name and address of the applicant.(2) The name and address of the business in which the taxpayer has invested.(3) A certified copy of the qualified business plan.(4) Documentation that the applicant is an accredited investor.(5) Documentation that the business in which the taxpayer has invested is a qualified business venture.(6) Documentation that the qualified investment has been made by the applicant.(7) Any other information required by the department.(b) Review.--The department, in conjunction with the Department of Revenue, shall review the application and determine if:(1) All requirements established under this article have 20250SB0191PN0141 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 been met.(2) The applicant has filed all required State tax reports and returns for all taxable years and paid any balance of State tax due as determined by the Department of Revenue.(c) Approval.--Upon being satisfied under subsection (b), the department shall approve the application and award the taxpayer a tax credit for the taxable year in the amount equal to 25% of the taxpayer's qualified investment made during the taxable year.(d) Notification.--The department shall notify the taxpayer of the amount of the taxpayer's tax credit within 30 days after approval by the department.Section 1706-M. Carryover, application of tax credit, carryback, refund and assignment.(a) Carryover.--If the taxpayer cannot use the entire amount of the tax credit for the taxable year in which the tax credit is first approved, the excess may be carried over to succeeding taxable years and used as a credit against the qualified tax liability of the taxpayer for those taxable years. Each time that the tax credit is carried over to a succeeding taxable year, the tax credit shall be reduced by the amount that was used as a credit during the immediately preceding taxable year. The tax credit may be carried over and applied to succeeding taxable years for no more than seven taxable years following the first taxable year for which the taxpayer was entitled to claim the tax credit.(b) Application of tax credit.--A tax credit approved by the department for a qualified investment in a taxable year shall first be applied against the taxpayer's qualified tax liability 20250SB0191PN0141 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for the current taxable year as of the date on which the tax credit was approved before the tax credit is applied against any tax liability under subsection (a).(c) Carryback or refund.--A taxpayer is not entitled to carry back or obtain a refund of an unused tax credit.(d) Sale or assignment.--A taxpayer, upon application to and approval by the department in consultation with the Department of Revenue, may sell or assign, in whole or in part, a tax credit granted to the taxpayer if the taxpayer does not have a qualified tax liability against which the tax credit may be applied in the current taxable year. The department shall establish guidelines, in consultation with the Department of Revenue, for the approval of applications under this subsection. Before an application is approved, the Department of Revenue must make a finding that the taxpayer and the taxpayer's assignee have filed all required State tax reports and returns for all taxable years and paid any balance of State tax due as determined by the Department of Revenue.(e) Purchasers and assignees.--The purchaser or assignee of all or a portion of a tax credit under subsection (d) shall immediately claim the credit in the taxable year in which the purchase or assignment is made, although the purchaser or assignee may carry over unused tax credit to the succeeding taxable year for up to two years. The amount of the tax credit that a purchaser or assignee may use against any one qualified tax liability may not exceed 75% of the qualified tax liability for the taxable year. The purchaser or assignee may not carry back or obtain a refund of or sell or assign the tax credit. The purchaser or assignee shall notify the department, and the department shall notify the Department of Revenue of the seller 20250SB0191PN0141 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or assignor of the tax credit in compliance with procedures specified by the department, in consultation with the Department of Revenue.Section 1707-M. Time limitation.A taxpayer shall not be entitled to a tax credit for qualified investments incurred in taxable years ending after December 31, 2033 . Section 1708-M. Limitation on tax credits.(a) Total amount.--The total amount of tax credits approved by the department in any calendar year may not exceed $20,000,000.(b) Allocation.--Tax credits shall be allocated by the department on a first-come, first-served basis.Section 1709-M. Shareholder, owner or member pass-through.(a) Shareholder entitlement.--If a Pennsylvania S corporation does not have an eligible tax liability against which the tax credit may be applied, a shareholder of the Pennsylvania S corporation shall be entitled to a tax credit equal to the tax credit determined for the Pennsylvania S corporation for the taxable year multiplied by the percentage of the Pennsylvania S corporation's distributive income to which the shareholder is entitled.(b) Pass-through entity entitlement.--If a pass-through entity other than a Pennsylvania S corporation does not have tax liability against which the tax credit may be applied, an owner or member of the pass-through entity shall be entitled to a tax credit equal to the tax credit determined for the pass-through entity for the taxable year multiplied by the percentage of the pass-through entity's distributive income to which the owner or member is entitled.20250SB0191PN0141 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Additional credit.--(1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), the tax credit provided under subsection (a) or (b) shall be in addition to any other tax credit to which a shareholder, owner or member of a pass-through entity is otherwise entitled under this article.(2) A pass-through entity and a shareholder, owner or member of a pass-through entity may not claim a tax credit for the same qualified investment.Section 1710-M. Repayment.The department shall require a taxpayer to repay a tax credit granted to the taxpayer where the department, in conjunction with the Department of Revenue, determines that any of the following conditions exist:(1) The qualified business venture did not satisfy the requirements of the qualified business plan submitted at the time of application.(2) The business in which the taxpayer made the qualified investment is no longer a qualified business venture.(3) The taxpayer received the tax credit as a result of fraud.Section 1711-M. Recapture.A taxpayer shall repay to the Commonwealth any or all of the tax credit claimed by the taxpayer if the taxpayer withdraws any portion of the taxpayer's qualified investment at any time during the period commencing with the date of the taxpayer's investment through the taxable year that the taxpayer claims or carries over unused portions of the tax credit under section 1706-M. The amount of the repayment shall be calculated as 20250SB0191PN0141 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 follows:(1) If the withdrawal occurs in the taxable year in which the investment was made or in the taxable year following the taxable year in which the investment was made, the aggregate amount of the tax credit claimed by the taxpayer during both taxable years shall be repaid to the Commonwealth.(2) If the withdrawal occurs in the second taxable year following the taxable year in which the investment was made or any subsequent taxable year, the amount of the tax credit claimed by the taxpayer in the taxable year in which the withdrawal occurs shall be repaid to the Commonwealth.Section 1712-M. Reports.(a) Annual report.--The secretary shall submit an annual report to the chairperson and minority chairperson of each standing committee in the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of each standing committee in the House of Representatives with jurisdiction over the department and the Department of Revenue as follows:(1) The report shall indicate the effectiveness of the tax credit.(2) The report shall be submitted no later than March 15 following the fiscal year in which the tax credit was approved.(3) Notwithstanding any law providing for the confidentiality of tax records, the report shall include the following:(i) The names of all taxpayers awarded the tax credit.(ii) The names of all taxpayers utilizing the tax 20250SB0191PN0141 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 credit.(iii) The amount of tax credits approved and utilized by each taxpayer.(iv) The names and locations of the qualified business ventures for which the tax credit was awarded.(4) The report may include any recommendation for changes in the calculation or administration of the tax credit.(b) Public record.--The report shall be considered a public record as defined in section 102 of the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.Section 1713-M. Termination.The department may not approve a tax credit for qualified investments incurred in taxable years ending after December 31, 2033 . Section 1714-M. Guidelines.The department, in consultation with the Department of Revenue, shall develop written guidelines for the implementation and administration of this article. The guidelines shall be posted on the department's publicly accessible Internet website . Section 4. The addition of Article XVII-M of the act shall apply to qualified investments made in taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.Section 5. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The following shall take effect immediately:The addition of Article XVII-M of the act.Section 3 of this act.This section.(2) The remainder of this act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0191PN0141 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930